Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Partition

Law reviews. —

For a note on the right of co-lessees under an oil and gas lease to compel partition in kind, see 3 Wyo. L.J. 144.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partition § 1 et seq.

Timber rights as subject to partition, 21 ALR2d 618.

Maintainability of partition action where United States or state owns an undivided interest in property, 59 ALR2d 937.

Grant of part of cotenancy land, taken from less than all cotenants, as subject of protection through partition, 77 ALR2d 1376.

Contractual provisions as affecting right to judicial partition, 37 ALR3d 962.

Right to partition of overriding royalty interest in oil and gas leasehold, 58 ALR3d 1052.

Judicial partition of land by lot or chance, 32 ALR4th 909.

Option to purchase real property as affected by optionor's receipt of offer for, or sale of, larger tract which includes the optioned parcel, 34 ALR4th 1217.

Contract of sale or granting of option to purchase, to third party, by both or all of joint tenants or tenants by entirety as severing or terminating tenancy, 39 ALR4th 1068.

Oil and gas royalty as real or personal property, 56 ALR4th 539.

68 C.J.S. Partition § 1 et seq.

§ 1-32-101.
Who compelled to make partition.

Tenants in common and
coparceners of any estate of lands, tenements or hereditaments within
the state may be compelled to make a partition thereof as hereinafter
prescribed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 614; R.S. 1887, § 2962; R.S. 1899, § 4081; C.S. 1910, § 4941; C.S. 1920, § 6211; R.S. 1931, § 89-3801; C.S. 1945, § 3-6901; W.S. 1957, § 1-935; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-201.

Cross references. —

As to power of guardian to act for ward, see §

1-32-117

.

As to powers of foreign guardian, see §

1-32-118

.

Civil action. —

An action for partition under this article is a civil action under the provisions of § 3-301, W.C.S. 1945, which abolishes the distinction between actions at law and suits in equity. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Court's jurisdiction. —

Where tenant in common brought suit for partition of described real estate and cotenant consented to the partition, though other lands held by the parties under leases were not included, court had jurisdiction to partition the land included in the petition. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

No person is compelled to remain a cotenant of another.

That was the rule of the Roman law. That, with a few exceptions, is the rule of the common law. And that is the rule under this section. In re Dixon's Estate, 66 Wyo. 197, 207 P.2d 510,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1949).

Cotenant cannot establish homestead as against other cotenant.
—

Tenants in common had equal right of possession and one cotenant could not establish a homestead right as against the interests of the other cotenants. The fact that the land in question was once the homestead of the father of the parties and that a patent was issued to him did not prevent partitioning among his heirs. Osborn v. Warner, 694 P.2d 730,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1985).

Action between siblings. —

Court properly granted first son summary judgment on second son's counterclaim to enforce divestiture of devised land and properly denied second son's motion to reopen the estate of the sons' father, since first son's petition to partition ranch did not request forced sale to third parties but allowed for equitable divisions and because “in terrorem” clause revoking bequests was not violated as first son withdrew challenge of second son's land lease. Sorenson v. Sorenson (In re Estate of Sorenson), 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

Estates in reversion or remainder. —

In absence of statute authorizing it, partition cannot be awarded, either at law or in equity, of an estate in reversion or remainder, but may be had between tenants for life or years, and between the owner of the fee of an undivided interest and a tenant for life of another undivided interest. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Partition as affected by lease given by part only of cotenants, 49 ALR2d 797.

§ 1-32-102.
Where proceedings to be had.

When the estate is situated
in one (1) county the proceedings shall be had in that county, and
when situated in two (2) or more counties the proceedings may be had
in any county in which a part of the estate is situated.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 615; R.S. 1887, § 2963; R.S. 1899, § 4082; C.S. 1910, § 4942; C.S. 1920, § 6212; R.S. 1931, § 89-3802; C.S. 1945, § 3-6902; W.S. 1957, § 1-936; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-202.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning venue in actions involving real property, see §§

1-5-101

and

1-5-102

.

Plaintiff Must Show His Title And Right to Possession.

Although defendant breached a supplemental agreement when it did not make a reassignment offer by a certain date, a state oil and gas lease never terminated. Because defendant retained the right to drill and produce the lands subject to the lease, plaintiffs could not show that they were entitled to possession of those lands or that defendant unlawfully kept them out of possession.
Stone v. Devon Energy Prod. Co., L.P., 2009 WY 114, 216 P.3d 489,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. Oct. 13, 2009), cert. denied, 559 U.S. 1068, 130 S. Ct. 2096, 176 L. Ed. 2d 724, 2010 U.S. LEXIS 3367 (U.S. 2010).

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-32-103.
Filing and contents of petition.

A person entitled to
partition of an estate may file his petition in the district court
setting forth the nature of his title, a description of the lands,
tenements or hereditaments of which partition is demanded, and naming
each tenant in common, coparcener or other interested person as defendant. If the petition seeks a division of property which
division would otherwise be subject to the provisions of title 18,
chapter 5, article 3 of the Wyoming statutes, the petition shall disclose
that fact.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 616; R.S. 1887, § 2964; R.S. 1899, § 4083; C.S. 1910, § 4943; C.S. 1920, § 6213; R.S. 1931, § 89-3803; C.S. 1945, § 3-6903; W.S. 1957, § 1-937; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-203; 2013 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence.

In general. —

Partition statute, requiring each tenant in common, coparcener, or “other interested person,” to be named defendants, does not prevent partition between parties in possession as tenants in common, though either or both hold less than a fee simple, where property is capable of partition. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Spouse of living co-owner of interest in property as necessary or proper party to partition action, 57 ALR2d 1166.

§ 1-32-104.
Finding of court; order for partition; appointment of commissioners;
ordering writ of execution to issue.

If the court finds that
the plaintiff has a legal right to any part of the estate, it shall
order partition in favor of the plaintiff or all parties in interest,
appoint three (3) disinterested persons of the vicinity to be commissioners
to make the partition and order a writ of execution to issue. A partition under this article shall be subject to
the provisions of title 18, chapter 5, article 3 of the Wyoming statutes
including any exemptions provided therein and as authorized by the
county pursuant to those provisions. The court shall order the partition
only after compliance by the petitioner with those provisions, as
applicable.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 617; R.S. 1887, § 2965; R.S. 1899, § 4084; C.S. 1910, § 4944; C.S. 1920, § 6214; R.S. 1931, § 89-3804; C.S. 1945, § 3-6904; W.S. 1957, § 1-938; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-204; 2013 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the second and third sentences.

Order as determination of rights. —

The rights of parties in action for partition are determined by the order which finds them to be tenants in common, ascertains and adjudges their respective shares, and orders a partition thereof, whether the order is final or interlocutory. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Although a partition agreement differed from the statutory scheme of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-32-104

, the agreement was properly enforced under Wyo. R. Civ. P. 70 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-32-108

when a co-tenant failed to abide by agreement. The “deemed denied” rule of Wyo. R. Civ. P. 6(c)(2) did not divest district court of subject matter jurisdiction to enter partition order because no showing of error was made and the motion at issue was interlocutory so that the court retained jurisdiction to enter the order enforcing partition after the original motion was deemed denied.
Bixler v. Oro Mgmt., 2006 WY 140, 145 P.3d 1260,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(2006).

Authority of court. —

After appointing commissioners to make a partition of property, a trial court did not err in vacating an easement that was created by the commissioners because both parties had requested modifications concerning the easement, and the commissioners had acknowledged that the decision to create the easement had probably created a lot of problems.
Platt v. Platt, 2011 WY 155, 264 P.3d 804,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-32-105.
Writ of partition directed to sheriff; contents; administering oath
to commissioners.

The writ of partition
may be directed to the sheriff of any county in which any part of
the estate lies, and shall command him to administer the oaths of
the commissioners, and setoff and divide to the plaintiff or each
party in interest such part and proportion of the estate as the court
shall order.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 618; R.S. 1887, § 2966; R.S. 1899, § 4085; C.S. 1910, § 4945; C.S. 1920, § 6215; R.S. 1931, § 89-3805; C.S. 1945, § 3-6905; W.S. 1957, § 1-939; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-205.

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-32-106.
View and examination of estate by commissioners; setting aside under
oath.

In making the partition,
the commissioners must examine the estate and set apart the same in
such lots as will be most advantageous and equitable, having due regard
to the improvements, situation and quality of the different parts.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 619; R.S. 1887, § 2967; R.S. 1899, § 4086; C.S. 1910, § 4946; C.S. 1920, § 6216; R.S. 1931, § 89-3806; C.S. 1945, § 3-6906; W.S. 1957, § 1-940; Laws l977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-206.

Preparation of report. —

Where commissioners in partition proceedings announced their conclusions in presence of both parties, and then requested counsel for one of them to prepare their report, and counsel did so in accordance with their conclusions, the adverse party was not prejudiced, where a copy of the report was handed to his counsel and opportunity afforded him to suggest changes before it was signed by the commissioners. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Contents of report. —

Rejection of report of commissioners in partition proceedings is not justified on grounds of an omission in the report of the facts concerning character and situation of the premises, nor because of failure to specifically state therein that partition has been equitably and advantageously made; the statute being silent respecting the contents of the report. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Unequal allotments. —

Action of commissioners in partition proceedings will not be set aside on ground of unequal allotments, except where partition appears to have been made on wrong principles, or where it is shown by clear preponderance of evidence that partition is grossly unequal. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Specific case. —

In suit for partition, evidence examined was held to warrant decision that commissioners appointed in proceedings to partition the premises acted fairly, and that the partition made by them was equitable. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-32-107.
Partition of several tracts.

When partition of more
than one (1) tract is demanded, the commissioners shall set off to
each plaintiff or party in interest his proper proportion in each
of the several tracts unless the several tracts are owned by the same
proprietors in the same proportion in each tract, in which case the
whole share of any proprietor in all the several tracts may be set
off to the proprietor according to the best discretion of the commissioners.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 620; R.S. 1887, § 2968; R.S. 1899, § 4087; C.S. 1910, § 4947; C.S. 1920, § 6217; R.S. 1931, § 89-3807; C.S. 1945, § 3-6907; W.S. 1957, § 1-941; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-207.

§ 1-32-108.
Amicable partition.

Before a writ of partition
is issued, the person of whom partition is demanded may appear in
court in person or by attorney and consent to a partition of the estate
according to the facts and prayer set forth in the petition. This
amicable partition, when made and recorded, is valid and binding between
the parties thereto.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 621; R.S. 1887, § 2969; R.S. 1899, § 4088; C.S. 1910, § 4948; C.S. 1920, § 6218; R.S. 1931, § 89-3808; C.S. 1945, § 3-6908; W.S. 1957, § 1-942; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-208.

Partition by consent was enforced. —

Although a partition agreement differed from the statutory scheme of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-32-104

, the agreement was properly enforced under Wyo. R. Civ. P. 70 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-32-108

when a co-tenant failed to abide by agreement. The “deemed denied” rule of Wyo. R. Civ. P. 6(c)(2) did not divest district court of subject matter jurisdiction to enter partition order because no showing of error was made and the motion at issue was interlocutory so that the court retained jurisdiction to enter the order enforcing partition after the original motion was deemed denied.
Bixler v. Oro Mgmt., 2006 WY 140, 145 P.3d 1260,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(2006).

Quoted

in

Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1907).

§ 1-32-109.
Appraisement required where estate cannot be divided according to
writ; return by commissioners; election to take at appraised value.

When the commissioners
are of the opinion that the estate cannot be divided according to
the demand of the writ without manifest injury to its value, they
shall return that fact to the court with a just valuation of the estate.
If the court approves the return and one (1) or more of the parties
elects to take the estate at such appraised value, it shall be adjudged
to him upon his paying to the other parties their proportion of the
appraised value according to their respective rights, or securing
the same as hereinafter provided.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 622; R.S. 1887, § 2970; R.S. 1899, § 4089; C.S. 1910, § 4949; C.S. 1920, § 6219; R.S. 1931, § 89-3809; C.S. 1945, § 3-6909; W.S. 1957, § 1-943; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-209.

Manifest injury to value of property.

District court's orders were not sufficiently complete to establish that a partition in kind could be made without manifest injury to the value of the property. The fact that a dedicated ditch was not located made any finding that partition in kind would not manifestly injure the value of the property clearly erroneous. Platt v. Platt, 2014 WY 142, 337 P.3d 431,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2014).

Party not compelled to sell. —

Where lands of tenants in common are capable of partition, the law does not compel party moving for partition to sell his interest for the price offered by the other party, though the price exceeds valuation placed on it by the commissioners appointed in the proceedings or by the party himself, so that such offer made and refused is no ground for rejecting commissioners' report of actual partition. Field v. Leiter, 16 Wyo. 1, 90 P. 378,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 16 Wyo. 1, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1907).

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

See “Can Co-Lessee Under An Oil & Gas Lease Compel a Partition in Kind?” 3 Wyo. L.J. 144.

§ 1-32-110.
Terms of payment upon election to take; execution of conveyance.

If one (1) or more of
the parties elects to take the estate at the appraised value, unless
the court for good cause directs the entire payment to be made in
cash, or unless all the parties in interest agree to different terms,
the terms of payment shall be one-third (1/3) cash, one-third (1/3) in
one (1) year and one-third (1/3) in two (2) years, with interest, the
deferred payments to be secured to the satisfaction of the court.
On payment in full or in part with sufficient security for the remainder,
the sheriff shall make and execute a conveyance to the party electing
to take the same according to the order of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 623; R.S. 1887, § 2971; R.S. 1899, § 4090; C.S. 1910, § 4950; C.S. 1920, § 6220; R.S. 1931, § 89-3810; C.S. 1945, § 3-6910; W.S. 1957, § 1-944; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-210.

Cross references. —

For provision that the successor to sheriff making the sale may execute deed, see §

1-32-116

.

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-32-111.
Order for sale of estate in absence of election to take.

If no election to take
the estate at the appraised value is made, at the instance of a party
the court may order the sale thereof at public auction by the sheriff
who executed the writ of partition or his successor.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 624; R.S. 1887, § 2972; R.S. 1899, § 4091; C.S. 1910, § 4951; C.S. 1920, § 6221; R.S. 1931, § 89-3811; C.S. 1945, § 3-6911; W.S. 1957, § 1-945; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-211.

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. Sorenson, 9 P.3d 259,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 1-32-112.
Conduct and terms of sale.

All such sales shall
be made at the courthouse unless the court for good cause directs
it to be made on the premises. The sale shall be conducted in all
respects as a sale upon execution except that it is not necessary
to appraise the estate. The estate shall not be sold for less than
two-thirds (2/3) of its appraised value as returned by the commissioners.
Unless the court directs for good cause the entire payment to be made
in cash, the purchase money is payable one-third (1/3) on the day of
sale, one-third (1/3) in one (1) year and one-third (1/3) in two (2) years,
with interest.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 625; R.S. 1887, § 2973; R.S. 1899, § 4092; C.S. 1910, § 4952; C.S. 1920, § 6222; R.S. 1931, § 89-3812; C.S. 1945, § 3-6912; W.S. 1957, § 1-946; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-212.

Cross references. —

As to rate of interest on judgments, see §

1-16-102

.

As to sale and redemption of realty upon execution, see chapter 18 of this title.

As to rate of interest when not provided otherwise by agreement or by law, see § 40-14-106(e).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Trust arising from parol agreement to bid on property sold at partition sale for person having an interest therein, 27 ALR2d 1285.

Estoppel of or waiver by parties or participants regarding irregularities or defects in partition sale, 2 A.L.R.2d 6.

Rights and remedies of one purchasing at partition sale where there was misrepresentation or mistake as to acreage or location of boundaries of tract sold, 69 ALR2d 254.

§ 1-32-113.
Return by sheriff of proceedings of sale; confirmation by court;
execution of deed of conveyance.

On the return by the
sheriff of his proceedings the court shall examine the same. If a
sale has been made and the court approves the sale, on receiving payment
of the consideration money or taking sufficient security therefor
to the satisfaction of the court, the sheriff shall execute and deliver
a deed to the purchaser.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 626; R.S. 1887, § 2974; R.S. 1899, § 4093; C.S. 1910, § 4953; C.S. 1920, § 6223; R.S. 1931, § 89-3813; C.S. 1945, § 3-6913; W.S. 1957, § 1-947; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-213.

Cross references. —

For provision that successor to sheriff making sale may execute deed, see §

1-32-116

.

§ 1-32-114.
Distribution of proceeds of sale or election to take; liability of
sheriff and his sureties.

The money or securities
arising from a sale of or an election to take the estate shall be
distributed and paid by order of the court to the parties entitled
thereto, in lieu of their respective parts and proportions of the
estate and according to their just rights therein. All receipts of
money or securities by the sheriff shall be in his official capacity,
and his sureties on his official bond are liable for any misapplication
thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 627; R.S. 1887, § 2975; R.S. 1899, § 4094; C.S. 1910, § 4954; C.S. 1920, § 6224; R.S. 1931, § 89-3814; C.S. 1945, § 3-6914; W.S. 1957, § 1-948; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-214.

Cross references. —

As to amercement of officers generally, see chapter 24 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of surviving spouse and children in proceeds of partition sale of homestead in decedent's estate, 6 ALR2d 515.

Partition action involving joint tenants with rights of survivorship.—

District court in partitioning a vacant lot that the parties owned as joint tenants with rights of survivorship properly ruled that each party owned an undivided, one-half interest in the property as one of the cotenants failed to rebut the presumption of equal shares. While the court could reduce one cotenant’s share of the proceeds by any disproportionate amount of property taxes and maintenance costs paid by the other cotenant, the court’s finding that the other cotenant had paid a particular sum of money in property taxes was erroneous. Gallagher v. Townsend, 2019 WY 66, 443 P.3d 847,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 1-32-115.
Alias writ for sale; reappraisement by disinterested persons; sale
with or without revaluation.

When the estate has been
once offered and not sold, an alias writ for the sale thereof may
be issued as often as need be. The court may order a reappraisement
by three (3) disinterested persons of the vicinity appointed by the
court, and direct a sale of the estate at not less than two-thirds
(2/3) of such appraised value, or if the court deem it for the interest
of the parties, may order a sale without such reappraisement at not
less than a sum it may fix.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 628; R.S. 1887, § 2976; R.S. 1899, § 4095; C.S. 1910, § 4955; C.S. 1920, § 6225; R.S. 1931, § 89-3815; C.S. 1945, § 3-6915; W.S. 1957, § 1-949; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-215.

§ 1-32-116.
Succeeding officer may make deed.

When a conveyance is
not made by the officer who made the sale, the court being satisfied
that the sale or election was regularly made and the purchase money
has been fully paid or secured, may order the sheriff of the county
or officer performing his duties to execute and deliver to the purchaser
or person electing to take the property a deed for the lands sold
or taken.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 629; R.S. 1887, § 2977; R.S. 1899, § 4096; C.S. 1910, § 4956; C.S. 1920, § 6226; R.S. 1931, § 89-3816; C.S. 1945, § 3-6916; W.S. 1957, § 1-950; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-216.

§ 1-32-117.
Guardian may act for ward.

The guardian of a minor
or other person under legal disability may on behalf of his ward do
and perform any act respecting the partition of an estate which the
minor or other person under legal disability could do. He may elect,
on behalf of the ward, to take the estate when the same cannot be
divided without injury, and make payments therefor on behalf of the
ward.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 630; R.S. 1887, § 2978; R.S. 1899, § 4097; C.S. 1910, § 4957; C.S. 1920, § 6227; R.S. 1931, § 89-3817; C.S. 1945, § 3-6917; W.S. 1957, § 1-951; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-217.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Guardian's position as joint tenant or successor to property in ward's estate as raising conflict of interest, 69 ALR3d 1198.

§ 1-32-118.
Powers of foreign guardian.

A person appointed according
to the laws of any other state or country to take charge of the estate
of a person under legal disability not a resident of this state, upon
being duly authorized in this state to take charge of the estate situate
in this state, may act in the partition of the estate to the same
extent that the guardian of a person under legal disability is authorized
to act by W.S.

1-32-117

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 631; R.S. 1887, § 2979; R.S. 1899, § 4098; C.S. 1910, § 4958; C.S. 1920, § 6228; R.S. 1931, § 89-3818; C.S. 1945, § 3-6918; W.S. 1957, § 1-952; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-218.

§ 1-32-119.
Actions by 1 tenant in common or coparcener against another.

One (1) tenant in common
or coparcener may recover from another his share of rents and profits
received by the tenant in common or coparcener from the estate. One
(1) parcener may maintain an action of waste against another, but
no parcener shall possess any privileges over another in any election,
division, partition or matter to be made or done concerning lands
which have descended.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 632; R.S. 1887, § 2980; R.S. 1899, § 4099; C.S. 1910, § 4959; C.S. 1920, § 6229; R.S. 1931, § 89-3819; C.S. 1945, § 3-6919; W.S. 1957, § 1-953; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-219.

Law reviews. —

See “Accountability of a Cotenant for Use and Occupation,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 156.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Relief against cotenant for rents and profits or use in occupation as an incident of or adjustment in partition, 51 ALR2d 388.

Compensation, in partition proceedings, for improvements made or placed on premises of another by mistake, 57 ALR2d 263.

§ 1-32-120.
Partition of property of religious corporations.

When two (2) or more
religious denominations or other societies or associations have united
in a corporation and as a corporation acquire title to real estate
in this state, and subsequently agree to separate and form two (2)
or more separate corporations, either corporation after the separate
organization may file its petition for partition of property so acquired
and held.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 633; R.S. 1887, § 2981; R.S. 1899, § 4100; C.S. 1910, § 4960; C.S. 1920, § 6230; R.S. 1931, § 89-3820; C.S. 1945, § 3-6920; W.S. 1957, § 1-954; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-220.

§ 1-32-121.
Partition of property of religious societies.

When two (2) or more
religious societies or congregations have acquired in common land
upon which to erect a house of public worship, buildings for church
or school purposes, or for a cemetery, and either desires to abandon
the joint use of the property, it may commence an action for the partition
of the common property except the cemetery, which may continue to
be used in common.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 634; R.S. 1887, § 2982; R.S. 1899, § 4101; C.S. 1910, § 4961; C.S. 1920, § 6231; R.S. 1931, § 89-3821; C.S. 1945, § 3-6921; W.S. 1957, § 1-955; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-221.

§ 1-32-122.
Costs and expenses to be equitably taxed.

The court shall tax the
costs and expenses which accrue in the action including reasonable
attorney’s fees for plaintiff’s attorney or any other attorney rendering
service in the case for the common benefit of all the parties.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 636; R.S. 1887, § 2984; R.S. 1899, § 4103; C.S. 1910, § 4963; C.S. 1920, § 6233; R.S. 1931, § 89-3823; C.S. 1945, § 3-6923; W.S. 1957, § 1-957; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-222.

Cross references. —

As to fees and costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.

Attorney's fee. —

In view of statute, trial court did not abuse discretion by allowing reasonable attorney's fee to plaintiff's counsel in partition action wherein asserted adverse interests were defeated, presumably by help of plaintiff's attorney. Hackett v. Linch, 57 Wyo. 289, 116 P.2d 868,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1941).

Cited

in

TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Allowance and apportionment of attorney's fees. 94 ALR2d 575.

Amount of attorney's compensation in matters involving real estate, 58 ALR3d 201.

Excessiveness or adequacy of attorneys' fees in matters involving real estate—modern cases, 10 ALR5th 448.